src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/V2-Oct_2016_gt-desc.yaml
     süttima+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: süttisid
     süttima+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: süttisin
     süttima+V+Pers+Sup+Ill: süttima
     süttima+V+Pers+Sup+Ela: süttimast
     süttima+V+Pers+Sup+Ine: süttimas
     süttima+V+Pers+Sup+Tra: süttimaks
     süttima+V+Pers+Sup+Abe: süttimata
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Prc: süttiv
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Quot: süttivat
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff: süttid
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Cond: süttiks
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff: süttiksid
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff: süttiksite
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff: süttiksime
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff: süttiksid
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff: süttiksin
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff: süttin
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff: süttime
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff: süttite
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff: süttivad
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff: süttib
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2: sütti
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: sütti
     süttima+V+Pers+Prt+Quot: süttinuvat
     süttima+V+Pers+Prt+Prc: süttinud
     süttima+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg: süttinud
     süttima+V+Pers+Prt+Cond: süttinuks
     süttima+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff: süttinuksid
     süttima+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff: süttinuksite
     süttima+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff: süttinuksime
     süttima+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff: süttinuksid
     süttima+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff: süttinuksin
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt: süttigu
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2: süttige
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1: süttigem
     süttima+V+Impers+Prt+Prc: süttitud
     süttima+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: süttitud
     süttima+V+Impers+Prt+Cond: süttituks
     süttima+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: süttitav
     süttima+V+Impers+Prs+Quot: süttitavat
     süttima+V+Impers+Prs+Cond: süttitaks
     süttima+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: süttita
     süttima+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff: süttitakse
     süttima+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt: süttitagu
     süttima+V+Impers+Sup: süttitama
     süttima+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff: süttiti
     süttima+V+Impers+Prt+Prc+Usage/Rare: sütitud
     süttima+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg+Usage/Rare: sütitud
     süttima+V+Impers+Prt+Cond+Usage/Rare: sütituks
     süttima+V+Impers+Prs+Prc+Usage/Rare: sütitav
     süttima+V+Impers+Prs+Quot+Usage/Rare: sütitavat
     süttima+V+Impers+Prs+Cond+Usage/Rare: sütitaks
     süttima+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg+Usage/Rare: sütita
     süttima+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff+Usage/Rare: sütitakse
     süttima+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt+Usage/Rare: sütitagu
     süttima+V+Impers+Sup+Usage/Rare: sütitama
     süttima+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff+Usage/Rare: sütiti
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff+Usage/Rare: sütid
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Usage/Rare: sütiks
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff+Usage/Rare: sütiksid
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff+Usage/Rare: sütiksite
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff+Usage/Rare: sütiksime
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff+Usage/Rare: sütiksid
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff+Usage/Rare: sütiksin
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff+Usage/Rare: sütin
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff+Usage/Rare: sütime
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff+Usage/Rare: sütite
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff+Usage/Rare: sütivad
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff+Usage/Rare: sütib
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2+Usage/Rare: süti
     süttima+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg+Usage/Rare: süti
     sööma+V+Impers+Prt+Prc: söödud
     sööma+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: söödud
     sööma+V+Impers+Prt+Cond: sööduks
     sööma+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: söödav
     sööma+V+Impers+Prs+Quot: söödavat
     sööma+V+Impers+Prs+Cond: söödaks
     sööma+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: sööda
     sööma+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt: söödagu
     sööma+V+Impers+Sup: söödama
     sööma+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff: söödi
     sööma+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff+Usage/NotNorm: söödakse
     sööma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt: söögu
     sööma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2: sööge
     sööma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1: söögem
     sööma+V+Pers+Sup+Ill: sööma
     sööma+V+Pers+Sup+Ela: söömast
     sööma+V+Pers+Sup+Ine: söömas
     sööma+V+Pers+Sup+Tra: söömaks
     sööma+V+Pers+Sup+Abe: söömata
     sööma+V+Pers+Prs+Prc: sööv
     sööma+V+Pers+Prs+Quot: söövat
     sööma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff: sööd
     sööma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond: sööks
     sööma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff: sööksid
     sööma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff: sööksite
     sööma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff: sööksime
     sööma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff: sööksid
     sööma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff: sööksin
     sööma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff: söön
     sööma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff: sööme
     sööma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff: sööte
     sööma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff: söövad
     sööma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff: sööb
     sööma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2: söö
     sööma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: söö
     sööma+V+Pers+Prt+Quot: söönuvat
     sööma+V+Pers+Prt+Prc: söönud
     sööma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg: söönud
     sööma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond: söönuks
     sööma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff: söönuksid
     sööma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff: söönuksite
     sööma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff: söönuksime
     sööma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff: söönuksid
     sööma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff: söönuksin
     söötma+V+Pers+Sup+Ill: söötma
     söötma+V+Pers+Sup+Ela: söötmast
     söötma+V+Pers+Sup+Ine: söötmas
     söötma+V+Pers+Sup+Tra: söötmaks
     söötma+V+Pers+Sup+Abe: söötmata
     söötma+V+Pers+Prs+Quot: söötvat
     söötma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff: söötsid
     söötma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff: söötsite
     söötma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff: söötsime
     söötma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: söötsid
     söötma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: söötsin
     söötma+V+Pers+Prt+Quot: söötnuvat
     söötma+V+Pers+Prt+Prc: söötnud
     söötma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg: söötnud
     söötma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond: söötnuks
     söötma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff: söötnuksid
     söötma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff: söötnuksite
     söötma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff: söötnuksime
     söötma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff: söötnuksid
     söötma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff: söötnuksin
     söötma+V+Inf: sööta
     söötma+V+Ger: söötes
     söötma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt: söötku
     söötma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2: söötke
     söötma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1: söötkem
     söötma+V+Pers+Prs+Prc: söötev
     söötma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff: söötis
     söötma+V+Impers+Prt+Prc: söödetud
     söötma+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: söödetud
     söötma+V+Impers+Prt+Cond: söödetuks
     söötma+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: söödetav
     söötma+V+Impers+Prs+Quot: söödetavat
     söötma+V+Impers+Prs+Cond: söödetaks
     söötma+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: söödeta
     söötma+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff: söödetakse
     söötma+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt: söödetagu
     söötma+V+Impers+Sup: söödetama
     söötma+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff: söödeti
     söötma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff: söödad
     söötma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond: söödaks
     söötma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff: söödaksid
     söötma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff: söödaksite
     söötma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff: söödaksime
     söötma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff: söödaksid
     söötma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff: söödaksin
     söötma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff: söödan
     söötma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff: söödame
     söötma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff: söödate
     söötma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff: söödavad
     söötma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff: söödab
     söötma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2: sööda
     söötma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: sööda
     sööma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff: sõid
     sööma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff: sõite
     sööma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff: sõime
     sööma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: sõid
     sööma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: sõin
     sööma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff: sõi
     sööma+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff: süüakse
     sööma+V+Inf: süüa
     sööma+V+Ger: süües
     ütlema+V+Pers+Sup+Ill: ütlema
     ütlema+V+Pers+Sup+Ela: ütlemast
     ütlema+V+Pers+Sup+Ine: ütlemas
     ütlema+V+Pers+Sup+Tra: ütlemaks
     ütlema+V+Pers+Sup+Abe: ütlemata
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prs+Prc: ütlev
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prs+Quot: ütlevat
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff: ütled
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond: ütleks
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff: ütleksid
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff: ütleksite
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff: ütleksime
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff: ütleksid
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff: ütleksin
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff: ütlen
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff: ütleme
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff: ütlete
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff: ütlevad
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff: ütleb
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2: ütle
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: ütle
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff: ütles
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff: ütlesid
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff: ütlesite
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff: ütlesime
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: ütlesid
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: ütlesin
     ütlema+V+Inf+Usage/Rare: ütelda
     ütlema+V+Ger+Usage/Rare: üteldes
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prt+Quot+Usage/Rare: ütelnuvat
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prt+Prc+Usage/Rare: ütelnud
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg+Usage/Rare: ütelnud
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Usage/Rare: ütelnuks
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff+Usage/Rare: ütelnuksid
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff+Usage/Rare: ütelnuksite
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff+Usage/Rare: ütelnuksime
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff+Usage/Rare: ütelnuksid
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff+Usage/Rare: ütelnuksin
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2+Usage/Rare: ütelge
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1+Usage/Rare: ütelgem
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Usage/Rare: ütelgu
     ütlema+V+Impers+Prt+Prc+Usage/Rare: üteldud
     ütlema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg+Usage/Rare: üteldud
     ütlema+V+Impers+Prt+Cond+Usage/Rare: ütelduks
     ütlema+V+Impers+Prs+Prc+Usage/Rare: üteldav
     ütlema+V+Impers+Prs+Quot+Usage/Rare: üteldavat
     ütlema+V+Impers+Prs+Cond+Usage/Rare: üteldaks
     ütlema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg+Usage/Rare: ütelda
     ütlema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff+Usage/Rare: üteldakse
     ütlema+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt+Usage/Rare: üteldagu
     ütlema+V+Impers+Sup+Usage/Rare: üteldama
     ütlema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff+Usage/Rare: üteldi
     tooma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff: tõid
     tooma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff: tõite
     tooma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff: tõime
     tooma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: tõid
     tooma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: tõin
     tooma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff: tõi
     teadma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff: tead
     teadma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond: teaks
     teadma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff: teaksid
     teadma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff: teaksite
     teadma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff: teaksime
     teadma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff: teaksid
     teadma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff: teaksin
     teadma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff: tean
     teadma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff: teame
     teadma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff: teate
     teadma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff: teavad
     teadma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff: teab
     teadma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2: tea
     teadma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: tea
     teadma+V+Pers+Sup+Ill: teadma
     teadma+V+Pers+Sup+Ela: teadmast
     teadma+V+Pers+Sup+Ine: teadmas
     teadma+V+Pers+Sup+Tra: teadmaks
     teadma+V+Pers+Sup+Abe: teadmata
     teadma+V+Pers+Prs+Quot: teadvat
     teadma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff: teadsid
     teadma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff: teadsite
     teadma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff: teadsime
     teadma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: teadsid
     teadma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: teadsin
     teadma+V+Pers+Prt+Quot: teadnuvat
     teadma+V+Pers+Prt+Prc: teadnud
     teadma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg: teadnud
     teadma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond: teadnuks
     teadma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff: teadnuksid
     teadma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff: teadnuksite
     teadma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff: teadnuksime
     teadma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff: teadnuksid
     teadma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff: teadnuksin
     teadma+V+Inf: teada
     teadma+V+Ger: teades
     teadma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt: teadku
     teadma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2: teadke
     teadma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1: teadkem
     teadma+V+Pers+Prs+Prc: teadev
     teadma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff: teadis
     teadma+V+Impers+Prt+Prc: teatud
     teadma+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: teatud
     teadma+V+Impers+Prt+Cond: teatuks
